Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Experiment Station and Extension Work

247.020.
Experiment stations — Substations — Experimental farms.

The College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky shall constitute the Agricultural Experiment Station.

The experiment station shall operate and direct the substations at Quicksand and Princeton which shall be divisions of the experiment station.

The experiment station may purchase, lease or accept gift of farms for use in its experimentation program.

History.

1822-1, 4636f-3, 4636f-6: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 107, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Agricultural experiment stations, federal laws, 7 USCS §§ 361a-390d.

Board of agriculture, director of experiment station is member of, KRS

246.120

.

Entomologist to prescribe rules with consent of director of experiment station, KRS

249.030

.

Fertilizers, duty of experiment station in respect to, KRS

250.361

to

250.451

.

University of Kentucky, appointment of officers and employees, KRS

164.220

.

247.025.
Purposes of experimental farms.

On experimental farms acquired under the provisions of subsection (3) of KRS

247.020

the agricultural experiment station shall conduct experimentation and demonstrations in the interest of agriculture, horticulture and forestry and the development thereof in the Commonwealth. In addition to the purposes set out in KRS

247.030

experimental farms shall be used to determine the phases of horticulture, forestry and agriculture, including grasslands, hay crops and rotation thereof, and animal husbandry best suited to particular soil belts and areas of the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 107, § 2.

247.030.
Functions of experiment station.

The experiment station shall make field experiments in order to ascertain by chemical and physical examination of soils and by direct experiments in laboratory and fields what crops and treatment are best suited to each type of soil, whether the present methods are tending to best results and to the preservation or reduction of fertility, what rotation and treatment will be most effective in retaining productive capacities of the soils of the various sections of the state and discover and demonstrate the best methods of marketing of fruits and vegetables.

It shall conduct investigations calculated to develop the beef, pork and mutton producing interests of the state, and especially feeding experiments intended to demonstrate the most successful combination of stock foods, discovering, if possible, the most economical and successful methods of maintaining animals and fitting them for the market. It shall also conduct pathological investigations and investigate livestock conditions both at home and abroad, in so far as they affect market values.

It shall conduct investigations for the purpose of developing the dairy interests of the state and undertake feeding experiments for production of milk and butter and the rearing of calves. It shall also study contagious diseases for the purpose of finding remedies for those diseases.

It shall conduct investigations for the purpose of developing the horse interests of the state, and study the best methods of feeding and breeding, and diseases.

It shall conduct experiments for the advancement of the poultry interests of the state and the economical production of poultry and eggs, including experiments in breeding for egg production and methods best adapted for hatching and raising of chicks.

It shall bring the scientific knowledge which it obtains concerning agriculture and home economics, to the farm and home by means of personal visitation, correspondence, cooperative demonstrations and experiments and the solution of local problems by station experts visiting the locality and studying the problems of the farm and home.

It shall conduct research and investigations for the purpose of advancing the development of a market for the commercial production of earthworms, including their potential for use in the areas of waste disposal and land reclamation.

History.

4636f-1: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 177; 1980, ch. 362, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

247.040.
Quicksand substation — Functions.

The Quicksand substation shall conduct experimental work and carry on investigations in timber production, forest growth, forest renewal and the utilization of forest products, the practicability of reforestation and the development of a permanent forest industry. It shall also conduct experimental work, investigations and demonstrations in the various phases of horticulture, animal husbandry and agriculture and such other investigations and demonstrations as bear directly upon the development of agriculture in eastern Kentucky.

History.

4636f-4.

247.045.
Duties of experiment station concerning control of black shank and other tobacco plant diseases.

The Kentucky Agricultural Experiment Station shall carry on and extend the present program in the field of tobacco breeding, research and education for the control of black shank and other diseases in tobacco. For this purpose there shall be available to the Kentucky agricultural experiment station, such sums as may, from time to time, be appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 27, § 1, effective June 19, 1952.

247.050.
Princeton substation — Functions.

The Princeton substation shall foster and promote agricultural interests and conduct experimental work, investigations and demonstrations in the various phases of agriculture, horticulture, animal husbandry and such other investigations and demonstrations as bear directly upon the development of the agricultural interests of Kentucky.

History.

4636f-6.

247.060.
Horticultural research.

The experiment station through the Princeton and Quicksand substations shall:

Discover and demonstrate the best known methods for the culture, packing and marketing of fruits;

Discover and demonstrate the most effective methods for the prevention and control of diseases and insects affecting fruit crops;

Make or cause to be made studies of the various types of pruning and cultural practices, and a thorough testing of the most promising new and approved varieties of fruits and plants;

Obtain and disseminate scientific and practical findings relating to the subjects mentioned in subsections (1), (2) and (3);

Arrange and promote meetings by which growers of fruits may exchange ideas and receive information relating to improved methods of growing, packing and marketing of fruits, and obtain and provide for outstanding specialists to attend and address such meetings;

Provide for the publication and distribution of bulletins giving the results of scientific and practical studies, of market information, and of such other facts and experiences as may be helpful to producers;

Provide for displaying fruit exhibits for the purpose of advertising the fruit production of the state, when such displays will promote the best interests of development of fruit production in the state; and

Carry on such other investigations and studies as will assist the horticultural interests of the state.

History.

4636m-2.

247.070.
University to establish cooperative marketing bureau.

The University of Kentucky shall establish in connection with its agricultural extension work a bureau for fostering cooperative marketing.

History.

4636g-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Cooperative marketing associations, KRS

272.101

to

272.345

.

247.080.
Boards of education may aid extension work.

County boards of education may appropriate such sums of money out of their annual funds as in their wisdom are necessary to aid in carrying on extension work in agriculture and home economics in their respective counties, in connection with the University of Kentucky.

History.

4636g-2; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 610, effective July 13, 1990.

247.085.
Research and extension program for improvement of dairy cattle through artificial insemination.

In addition to the other experiments carried on by the University of Kentucky at Lexington, Kentucky, the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky shall do research and supervise the extension program for the improvement of dairy cattle of the State of Kentucky, through the wide distribution of superior germ plasma of carefully chosen dairy cattle bulls in cooperation with the artificial breeding associations located in the State of Kentucky and to provide for developing improved methods of carrying on the work of artificial breeding and to train master technicians.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 6, § 1.

247.086.
Seed stocks or foundation seeds — Program for development of.

The Kentucky agricultural experiment station shall carry on and extend the present program for development of improved crop varieties, acting through and in cooperation with Kentucky Seed Stocks, Inc., in the production, supplying, furnishing and distribution of seed stocks or foundation seeds. For this purpose there shall be available to the Kentucky agricultural experiment station such sums as may, from time to time, be appropriated by the general assembly for the purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 36, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Agricultural seeds, KRS

250.010

,

250.021

to

250.111

.

247.087.
Research and development program concerning forage-crop breeding and grassland farming.

The program of the Kentucky Agricultural Experiment Station in the field of forage-crop breeding and research in the development of grassland farming is recognized and established. Such program shall be continued and extended, especially in the establishment and maintenance of good pastures. For this purpose there shall be available to the Kentucky Agricultural Experiment Station such sums as may, from time to time, be appropriated for the purpose by the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 118, § 1, effective June 17, 1954.

247.088.
Assessment of effect of agricultural practices upon groundwater resources.

The College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky, through the agricultural experiment station and the cooperative extension service shall assess the effect of agricultural practices upon groundwater resources, establish basic and applied research programs to determine agricultural management practices which may be necessary to protect groundwater resources, and establish and implement an educational program to encourage the use of agricultural practices which conserve, maintain, and improve soil productivity and to assure protection of groundwater. The college shall seek the cooperation of the Division of Conservation within the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the Kentucky Farm Bureau, and other organizations in implementing the educational program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 307, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 24, § 600, effective July 15, 2010.